Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.
§ 22.1-299.5.
Waiver of teacher licensure requirements; trade and industrial education programs.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any division superintendent may apply to the Department of Education for a biennial waiver of the teacher licensure requirements for any individual whom the local school board hires or seeks to hire to teach in a trade and industrial education program who has obtained or is working toward an industry credential relating to the program area and who has at least 4,000 hours of recent and relevant employment experience, as defined by the Board pursuant to regulation.

The Department of Education shall establish a procedure for submitting, receiving, and acting upon such biennial waiver applications.

History.

2016, c. 435; 2018, cc. 748, 749.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 748 and 749 are identical, and substituted “a biennial waiver” for “an annual waiver” in subsection A and “biennial waiver” for “annual waiver” in subsection B.

§ 22.1-299.6.
Career and technical education; three-year licenses.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board shall provide for the issuance of three-year licenses to qualified individuals to teach, either full time or part time, high school career and technical education courses in specific subject areas.

The Board shall issue a three-year license to teach high school career and technical education courses in a specific subject area to an individual who:

Submits an application to the Board, in the form prescribed by the Board, that includes a recommendation for such a license from the local school board;

Meets certain basic conditions for licensure as prescribed by the Board;

Meets one of the following requirements: (i) holds, at a minimum, a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education and has completed coursework in the career and technical education subject area in which the individual seeks to teach, (ii) holds the required professional license in the specific career and technical education subject area in which the individual seeks to teach, where applicable, or (iii) holds an industry certification credential, as that term is defined in § 22.1-298.1, in the specific career and technical education subject area in which the individual seeks to teach;

Has at least four years of full-time work experience or its equivalent in the specific career and technical education subject area in which the individual seeks to teach; and

If appropriate, has obtained qualifying scores on the communication and literacy professional teacher’s assessment prescribed by the Board.

The employing school board shall assign a mentor to supervise an individual issued a three-year license pursuant to this section during his first two years of teaching.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection E, any individual issued a three-year license pursuant to this section may be granted subsequent three-year extensions of such license by the Board upon recommendation of the local school board.

Any individual issued a three-year license pursuant to this section who completes (i) nine semester hours of specialized professional studies credit from a regionally accredited institution of higher education or (ii) an alternative course of professional studies proposed by the local school board and approved by the Department of Education shall be granted a three-year extension of such license by the Board and may be granted subsequent three-year extensions of such license by the Board upon recommendation of the local school board. Any such specialized professional studies credit or alternative course of professional studies may be completed through distance learning programs and shall include human growth and development; curriculum, instructional, and technology procedures; and classroom and behavior management.

No three-year license issued by the Board pursuant to this section shall be deemed a provisional license or a renewable license, as those terms are defined in § 22.1-298.1.

Individuals issued a three-year license pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for continuing contract status while teaching under such license and shall be subject to the probationary terms of employment specified in § 22.1-303.

The provisions of this article and of Board regulations governing the denial, suspension, cancellation, revocation, and reinstatement of licensure shall apply to three-year licenses issued pursuant to this section.

The Board shall report at least triennially to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on the issuance of three-year licenses pursuant to this section by high school, local school division, and career and technical education subject area.

History.

2016, cc. 642, 651; 2018, cc. 748, 749.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2016 acts having been § 22.1-299.5.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 748 and 749 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “either full time or part time” and deleted “for no more than 50 percent of the instructional day or year, on average” at the end; in subdivision B 5, inserted “If appropriate” at the beginning; in subsection C, substituted “first two years” for “first year.”

§ 22.1-299.7.
Microcredential program; certain STEM subjects.

The Department of Education may establish a microcredential program for the purpose of permitting any public elementary or secondary school teacher who holds a renewable or provisional license or any individual who participates in any alternate route to licensure program to complete additional coursework and earn microcredentials in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) endorsement areas, including computer science, for which there is a high need for additional qualified teachers.

The Department of Education shall direct the Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure to convene a workgroup including pertinent education stakeholders to determine how any microcredential awarded pursuant to any microcredential program established pursuant to subsection A will be used to award add-on endorsements and certifications for teachers in STEM endorsement areas, including computer science, for which there is a high need for additional qualified teachers.

Any course offered through any microcredential program established pursuant to subsection A shall be offered in-person or in a blended format of in-person and online instruction.

Any teacher who holds a renewable license and who participates, through any microcredential program offered pursuant to subsection A, in courses that do not contribute to an endorsement is eligible for professional development points toward renewal of his license for the number of in-person hours of coursework completed, upon providing a certificate of such participation from the course provider.

History.

2019, cc. 227, 597.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 510, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Education shall develop a plan to adopt and implement standards for microcredentials used toward add-on endorsements and renewal of licenses earned by Virginia license holders in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields. Such plan shall include (i) a process for reviewing and administering educator microcredentials; (ii) assurances that educator microcredentials rely upon demonstrable evidence from the submission of artifacts, such as student projects and teacher lesson plans, that are then objectively scored against existing rubrics; and (iii) assurances that educator microcredentials focus on interrelated competencies leading to logical teacher professional development pathways and stacks of educator microcredentials and align with the Board of Education’s ongoing work on educator professional development. Such plan shall also include the resources needed for statewide implementation. The Department of Education shall complete and submit the plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations no later than December 1, 2020.”

§ 22.1-299.7:1.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Microcredential program; reading specialists.

The Department shall establish a microcredential program for the purpose of permitting any public elementary or secondary school teacher who holds a renewable or provisional license or any individual who participates in any alternate route to licensure program to earn a series of microcredentials in the reading specialist endorsement area. Such microcredential program shall require candidates to complete a performance-based assessment intended to allow the educator to demonstrate competency in evidence-based literacy instruction and science-based reading research as well as the identification of and the appropriate interventions, accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with dyslexia or a related disorder.

The Board shall issue guidance that determines how the series of microcredentials awarded to teachers pursuant to the microcredential program established in accordance with subsection A will be used to award an add-on endorsement as a reading specialist. Any add-on endorsement that results from completion of such microcredential program shall be provisional for a period of five years.

A local school board may employ a teacher with an add-on endorsement as a reading specialist pursuant to this section to satisfy the requirement set forth in subsection G of § 22.1-253.13:2 if the local school board is unable to employ a teacher with a full endorsement as a reading specialist.

Teachers who hold a renewable license and who participate, through the microcredential program established in accordance with subsection A, in courses that do not contribute to an endorsement are eligible for professional development points toward renewal of their license for the number of in-person hours of coursework completed upon providing a certificate of such participation from the course provider.

History.

2022, cc. 550, 549.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2022, cc. 549 and 550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

§ 22.1-299.8.
Technical professional licenses; substitution of certain professional development activities for required coursework.

The Board shall permit any individual who seeks a technical professional license to substitute the successful completion of an intensive, job-embedded, three-year program of professional development for the nine semester hours of professional studies required for such license.

History.

2020, c. 684.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 684, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall adopt such regulations as it deems necessary to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 22.1-300.
Tuberculosis certificate.

As a condition to employment, every public school employee, including without limitation teachers, cafeteria workers, janitors and bus drivers, shall submit a certificate signed by a licensed physician, or by a registered nurse licensed pursuant to Article 2 (§

54.1-3016

et seq.) of Chapter 30 of Title 54.1, stating that such employee appears free of communicable tuberculosis. Such certificate shall be based on recorded results of such skin tests, X-rays and other examinations, singly or in combination, as are deemed necessary by a licensed physician that have been performed within the twelve months’ period immediately preceding submission of the certificate. After consulting with the local health director, any school board may require the submission of such certificates annually, or at such intervals as it deems appropriate, as a condition to continued employment.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-249; 1968, c. 445; 1970, c. 526; 1973, c. 491; 1974, c. 160; 1977, c. 220; 1979, c. 262; 1980, c. 559; 1994, c. 68; 2000, c. 476.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 476 deleted “and employed by a local health department” following “Title 54.1.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

§ 22.1-301.
Costs of medical examinations and of furnishing medical records.

It shall be unlawful for any school board to require any instructional employee to pay the costs of a medical examination or the cost of furnishing medical records required as a condition to continued employment. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the immediate supervisor from requesting an employee to submit a physician’s certificate verifying the illness of an employee at the employee’s expense.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-249; 1968, c. 445; 1970, c. 526; 1973, c. 491; 1974, c. 160; 1977, c. 220; 1979, c. 262; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-302.
Written contracts required; execution of contracts; qualifications of temporarily employed teachers; rules and requirements.

A written contract, in a form permitted by the Board of Education’s regulations, shall be made by the school board with each teacher employed by it, except those who are temporarily employed, before such teacher enters upon his duties. Such contract shall be signed in duplicate, with a copy thereof furnished to both parties.The standard 10-month contract shall include 200 days, including (i) a minimum of 180 teaching days or 990 instructional hours and (ii) up to 20 days for activities such as teaching, participating in professional development, planning, evaluating, completing records and reports, participating on committees or in conferences, or such other activities as may be assigned or approved by the local school board.A temporarily employed teacher, as used in this section, means (i) one who is employed to substitute for a contracted teacher for a temporary period of time during the contracted teacher’s absence or (ii) one who is employed to fill a teacher vacancy for a period of time, but for no longer than 90 teaching days in such vacancy, unless otherwise approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction on a case-by-case basis, during one school year.

Temporarily employed teachers, as defined in this section, shall be at least 18 years of age and shall hold a high school diploma or have passed a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education.A temporarily employed teacher is not required to be licensed by the Board of Education, nor is the local school board required to enter into a written contract with a temporarily employed teacher. However, local school boards shall establish employment qualifications for temporarily employed teachers that may exceed these requirements for the employment of such teachers. School boards shall also seek to ensure that temporarily employed teachers who are engaged as long-term substitutes exceed baseline employment qualifications.

A separate contract in a form permitted by the Board of Education shall be executed by the school board with a teacher who is receiving a monetary supplement for any athletic coaching or extracurricular activity sponsorship assignment. This contract shall be separate and apart from the contract for teaching.Termination of a separate contract for any athletic coaching or extracurricular activity sponsorship assignment by either party thereto shall not constitute cause for termination of the separate teaching contract of the coach or teacher.All such contracts shall require the party intending to terminate the coaching or extracurricular activity sponsorship contract to give reasonable notice to the other party before termination thereof shall become effective.For the purposes of this section, “extracurricular activity sponsorship” means an assignment for which a monetary supplement is received, requiring responsibility for any student organizations, clubs, or groups, such as service clubs, academic clubs and teams, cheerleading squads, student publication and literary groups, and visual and performing arts organizations except those that are conducted in conjunction with regular classroom, curriculum, or instructional programs.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.2; 1968, c. 691; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 92; 1990, c. 388; 1996, c. 986; 1997, c. 689; 1999, c. 486; 2010, c. 93; 2013, cc. 588, 644, 650; 2014, c. 84.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 93, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education shall develop guidelines to implement the provisions of subsection A of § 22.1-302 pertaining to the employment of substitutes for longer than 90 teaching days during one school year, no later than July 1, 2011.”

The 1999 amendment

added the paragraph designations A, B and C to the former first, second and third paragraphs; and added the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 93 inserted “unless otherwise approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction on a case-by-case basis” in clause (ii) of the third sentence of subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “permitted by the Board of Education’s regulations” for “prescribed by the Board of Education” in the first sentence, and inserted the second paragraph; added the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “permitted” for “prescribed” and “a teacher” for “such employee.”

The 2013 amendment by c. 644 substituted “means” for “shall mean” in the first sentence of the third paragraph of subsection A; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, deleted “The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations regarding” at the beginning, and substituted “shall be at least 18 years of age and shall” for “which shall provide that such teachers be at least eighteen years of age and that they” in the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph substituted “that may exceed these requirements” for “which may exceed the Board’s regulations” and deleted “shall” following “long-term substitutes” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection B, substituted “have passed a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a general educational development (GED) certificate.”

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

§ 22.1-303.
Probationary terms of service for teachers.

A probationary term of service of three years in the same school division shall be required before a teacher is issued a continuing contract. School boards shall provide each probationary teacher except probationary teachers who have prior successful teaching experience, as determined by the local school board in a school division, a mentor teacher, as described by Board guidelines developed pursuant to § 22.1-305.1, during the first year of the probationary period, to assist such probationary teacher in achieving excellence in instruction. During the probationary period, such probationary teacher shall be evaluated annually based upon the evaluation procedures developed by the employing school board for use by the division superintendent and principals in evaluating teachers as required by subsection C of § 22.1-295. A teacher in his first year of the probationary period shall be evaluated informally at least once during the first semester of the school year. The division superintendent shall consider such evaluations, among other things, in making any recommendations to the school board regarding the nonrenewal of such probationary teacher’s contract as provided in § 22.1-305.

Any teacher hired on or after July 1, 2001, shall be required, as a condition of achieving continuing contract status, to have successfully completed training in instructional strategies and techniques for intervention for or remediation of students who fail or are at risk of failing the Standards of Learning assessments. Local school divisions shall be required to provide said training at no cost to teachers employed in their division. In the event a local school division fails to offer said training in a timely manner, no teacher will be denied continuing contract status for failure to obtain such training.

Once a continuing contract status has been attained in a school division in the Commonwealth, another probationary period need not be served in any other school division unless such probationary period, not to exceed two years, is made a part of the contract of employment. Further, when a teacher has attained continuing contract status in a school division in the Commonwealth and separates from and returns to teaching service in a school division in Virginia by the beginning of the third year, such teacher shall be required to serve a probationary period not to exceed two years, if made a part of the contract for employment.

For the purpose of calculating the years of service required to attain continuing contract status, at least 160 contractual teaching days during the school year shall be deemed the equivalent of one year in the first year of service by a teacher.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.3; 1968, c. 691; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 3; 1976, cc. 191, 226; 1979, c. 275; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 348; 1989, c. 100; 1999, cc. 831, 1030, 1037; 2000, c. 689; 2001, cc. 865, 872; 2006, c. 373; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2020, cc. 53, 167; 2022, c. 355.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 831 added the subsection A designator, added the last three sentences in the first paragraph, and added the second paragraph in said subsection; and added the subsection B and C designators to the last two paragraphs.

The 1999 amendment by c. 1030 added the subsection A designator, added the last three sentences in the first paragraph, and added the subsection B and C designators to the last two paragraphs.

The 1999 amendment by c. 1037 added the subsection A designator, added the last three sentences in the first paragraph, and added the subsection B and C designators to the last two paragraphs.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 689 added subsection D.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 865 and 872 are identical, and added the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 373 substituted “§ 22.1-295 C” for “§ 22.1-295 B” in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “of at least three years and, at the option of the local school board, up to five years” for “for three” in the first sentence, “teachers” for “instructional personnel” in the third sentence, and inserted the fourth sentence; substituted “two years” for “one year” two times in subsection B; deleted “three” following “calculating the” in subsection C; and in subsection D, substituted “issued prior to July 1, 2013” for “pursuant to § 22.1-299.3” in the first sentence, and “a probationary term of service of at least three years and, at the option of the local school board, up to five years” for “the three year period” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 53 and 167 are identical, and in the first sentence of subsection A and the last sentence in subsection D, substituted “three years” for “at least three years and, at the option of the local school board, up to five years”; and in subsection A, deleted the second paragraph, which read: “If the teacher’s performance evaluation during the probationary period is not satisfactory, the school board shall not reemploy the teacher; however, nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to require cause, as defined in § 22.1-307, for the nonrenewal of the contract of a teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted former subsection D, which read: “Teachers holding three-year local eligibility licenses issued prior to July 1, 2013, shall not be eligible for continuing contract status while teaching under the authority of such license. Upon attainment of a collegiate professional or postgraduate professional license issued by the Department of Education, such teachers shall serve a probationary term of service of three years prior to being eligible for continuing contract status pursuant to this section.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

§ 22.1-303.1.
Immunity from civil liability for certain individuals.

Any teacher who, in good faith, participates in conducting a peer review of another teacher or a person who conducts a review of a teacher as a mentor teacher shall be immune from civil liability for any act, omission or statement made in the performance of these duties unless such act, omission or statement was made in bad faith or with malicious intent.

History.

1988, c. 319; 1999, cc. 1030, 1037.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and substituted “as a mentor teacher” for “under the Beginning Teacher Assistance Program.”

§ 22.1-304.
Reemployment of teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status; effect of continuing contract; resignation of teacher; reduction in number of teachers.

If a teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status receives notice of reemployment, he must accept or reject in writing within 15 days of receipt of such notice. Except as provided in § 22.1-305 and except in the case of a reduction in force as provided in subsection F, written notice of nonrenewal of the probationary contract must be given by the school board on or before June 15 of each year. If no such notice is given a teacher by June 15, the teacher shall be entitled to a contract for the ensuing year in accordance with local salary stipulations including increments.

Teachers employed after completing the probationary period shall be entitled to continuing contracts during good behavior and competent service. Written notice of noncontinuation of the contract by either party must be given by June 15 of each year; otherwise the contract continues in effect for the ensuing year in conformity with local salary stipulations including increments.

A teacher may resign after June 15 of any school year with the approval of the local school board or, upon authorization by the school board, with the approval of the division superintendent. The teacher shall request release from contract at least two weeks in advance of intended date of resignation. Such request shall be in writing and shall set forth the cause of resignation.If the division superintendent has been authorized to approve resignations, a teacher may, within one week, withdraw a request to resign. Upon the expiration of the one-week period, the division superintendent shall notify the school board of his decision to accept or reject the resignation. The school board, within two weeks, may reverse the decision of the division superintendent.In the event that the board or the division superintendent declines to grant the request for release on the grounds of insufficient or unjustifiable cause, and the teacher breaches such contract, disciplinary action, which may include written reprimand, suspension, or revocation of the teacher’s license, may be taken pursuant to regulations prescribed by the Board of Education.

As soon after June 15 as the school budget shall have been approved by the appropriating body, the school board shall furnish each teacher a statement confirming continuation of employment, setting forth assignment and salary.Nothing in the continuing contract shall be construed to authorize the school board to contract for any financial obligation beyond the period for which funds have been made available with which to meet such obligation.

A school board may reduce the number of teachers, whether or not such teachers have reached continuing contract status, because of decrease in enrollment or abolition of particular subjects.

Within two weeks of the approval of the school budget by the appropriating body, but no later than July 1, school boards shall notify all teachers who may be subject to a reduction in force due to a decrease in the school board’s budget as approved by the appropriating body.

If a school board implements a reduction in workforce pursuant to this section, such reduction shall not be made solely on the basis of seniority but must include consideration of, among other things, the performance evaluations of the teachers potentially affected by the reduction in workforce.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.4; 1968, c. 691; 1978, c. 147; 1979, c. 98; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 132; 1993, c. 294; 1996, c. 840; 2000, c. 709; 2001, c. 540; 2002, c. 714; 2003, c. 706; 2012, cc. 106, 687; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2019, c. 587; 2020, c. 513.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 540, which amended subsection F, provides in cl. 2: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 23, 2001].”

Acts 2001, c. 540, which amended subsection F, provides in cl. 3: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2003.” Acts 2003, c. 706, deleted the version of subsection F that was to become effective July 1, 2003.

Acts 2002, c. 714, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [April 6, 2002].”

Acts 2002, c. 714, cl. 3, which provided that amendments to this section by Acts 2002, c. 714, would expire on July 1, 2003, was itself repealed by Acts 2003, c. 706, cl. 2.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 709 inserted “and except in the case of a reduction in force as provided in subsection F” in the second sentence of present subsection A; added designations for subsections A through E; and added subsection F.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 540, effective March 23, 2001, in subsection F, substituted “the school boards of any (i) county” for “the school board of a county” and inserted the language beginning “(ii) county having the urban” and ending “United States Census.” For expiration, see Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 714, effective April 6, 2002, substituted “Within two weeks of the approval of the school budget by the appropriating body, but no later than June 1, school boards” for “By May 15 of each year, the school boards of any (i) county having the county executive form of government that is adjacent to a county having the urban county executive form of government, (ii) county having the urban county executive form of government, (iii) county having the county manager plan form of government, and (iv) city having a population of not less than 105,000 nor more than 125,000 according to the 1990 United States Census” in subsection F. For expiration, see Editor’s note.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 706, effective March 19, 2003, deleted the version of subsection F which was to become effective July 1, 2003. Acts 2003, c. 706, cl. 2, repealed the expiration provisions of the 2002 amendment to subsection F; thus subsection F is set out above as amended by Acts 2002, c. 714.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 106 and 687 are identical, and substituted “June 15” for “April 15” throughout the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and inserted “probationary” following “nonrenewal of the” in the second sentence of subsection A; deleted “and prior to the age at which they are eligible or required to retire except as hereinafter provided” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B; substituted “July 1” for “June 1” in subsection F; and added subsection G.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 587 inserted “written reprimand or” in the third paragraph of subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 513 substituted “written reprimand, suspension, or revocation” for “written reprimand or revocation” in subsection C in the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4A M.J. Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 6; 16 M.J. Schools, § 20.

§ 22.1-305.
Nonrenewal of contract of probationary teacher.

Before a division superintendent recommends to the school board nonrenewal of the contract of a teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status, the division superintendent shall consider, among other things, the performance evaluations for such teacher required by § 22.1-303 and shall notify the teacher of the proposed recommendation. Upon written request of the teacher within five working days after receipt of such notice, the division superintendent or his designee shall orally provide the specific reasons, if any, for such recommendation, along with supporting documentation, including such performance evaluations, to the teacher and, if requested by the teacher, to his or her representative. Within 10 days after receiving such reasons, the teacher may request, by notification in writing to the division superintendent, a conference before the division superintendent. Upon such request, the division superintendent shall set a date for the conference, which shall be within 30 days of the request, and shall give the teacher at least 15 days’ notice of the time and place of the conference.

The conference shall be before the division superintendent or his designee. No such designee shall have recommended to the division superintendent the nonrenewal of the teacher’s contract. The teacher and the person or persons who recommended the nonrenewal of the teacher’s contract to the division superintendent, or a representative of either or both, shall be allowed to participate in the conference, but no such representative shall be an attorney.

If the conference is before a designee of the division superintendent, the designee shall communicate his recommendations to the division superintendent and to the teacher.

The division superintendent shall notify the teacher, in writing, of his intention with respect to the recommendation within 10 days after the conference.

In any case in which a teacher requests reasons for the recommendation as provided in this section, written notice of nonrenewal of the contract by the school board must be given either within 10 days after the time for requesting a conference has expired and the teacher has not made a timely request for a conference or, if a conference is requested, within 30 days after the division superintendent notifies the teacher of his intention with respect to the recommendation and the provisions of § 22.1-304 requiring such notice on or before June 15 shall not be applicable.

The conference shall be confidential and no written or oral communication of such conference shall be made to anyone other than the school board, in executive session, and employees of the school division having an interest therein; however, both the teacher and the division superintendent, upon request, may provide the reasons for the nonrenewal to a potential employer of the teacher.

The provisions of this section shall be inapplicable when a decrease in enrollment or the abolition of a particular subject or reduction in the number of classes offered in a particular subject causes a reduction in the number of teachers; however, a statement to that effect shall be placed in the personnel file of each teacher whose contract is nonrenewed for any such reason.

The intent of this section is to provide an opportunity for a probationary teacher to discuss the reasons for nonrenewal with the division superintendent or his designee, and the provisions of this section are meant to be procedural only. Nothing contained herein shall be taken to require cause, as defined in § 22.1-307, for the nonrenewal of the contract of a teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status nor shall the failure of the school board or the division superintendent to comply with any time requirement herein constitute a basis for continued employment of the teacher.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.4:1; 1979, c. 98; 1980, c. 559; 1999, cc. 1030, 1037; 2013, cc. 588, 650.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “shall consider, among other things, the performance evaluations for such teacher required by § 22.1-303 and,” and in the second sentence, substituted “including such performance evaluations” for “if any”; substituted “April 15” for “April fifteenth” near the end of subsection E; and substituted “however” for “provided, however, that” in subsections F and G.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection E, substituted “reasons for the recommendation” for “conference,” inserted “either within 10 days after the time for requesting a conference has expired and the teacher has not made a timely request for a conference or, if a conference is requested,” and substituted “June 15” for “April 15”; and made stylistic changes throughout the section.